Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2232
Sheriffs; general powers.

All sheriffs shall be ministerial officers in county courts in their respective jurisdictions' civil and criminal cases, and civil and criminal processes may be executed by them throughout the jurisdiction.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 171, p. 323;

C.S.1929, § 22-1501;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,172;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,172;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 40;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 11;

R.S.Supp,1988, § 24-595;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 16.